Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-924
Designation of assets; procedure.

A designation of assets pursuant to section 68-922 shall be evidenced by a written statement listing such assets and signed by the spouse. A copy of such statement shall be provided to the department at the time of application and shall designate assets owned as of the date of application. Failure to complete any assignments or transfers necessary to place the designated assets in sole ownership of the spouse within a reasonable time after the statement is signed as provided in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under section 68-922 may render the applicant or recipient ineligible for assistance in accordance with such rules and regulations.

Laws 1988, LB 419, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 362, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1042;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 253.